Illinois, session 104th, SB1964.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Rental 5Fee Transparency and Fairness Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Agent" means a person who is licensed as a real estate 8broker or real estate salesperson and is acting in a fiduciary 9capacity.10    "Dual agent" means an agent who is acting as a tenant's 11agent and a landlord's agent regarding the same residential 12real property.13    "Engage" means to enter into an agreement that requires 14the payment of a fee by a person for the performance of 15services by another person.16    "Fee" means an amount of money that is charged by a person 17for the provision of services to one or more persons.18    "Landlord's agent" means a listing agent who acts alone, 19or an agent who acts in cooperation with a listing agent, acts 20as a landlord's subagent, or acts as a broker's agent, to find 21or obtain a tenant for residential real property. "Landlord's 22agent" does not include a dual agent.23    "Lease" or "lease agreement" mean an agreement for the   SB1964- 2 -LRB104 09842 JRC 19910 b1rental of residential property.2    "Listing" means an advertisement or written notice 3conveying that a property is available for lease.4    "Listing agent" means a person who has entered into a 5listing agreement to act as an agent of the landlord for 6compensation.7    "Listing agreement" means an agreement between an owner of 8residential real property and an agent, by which the agent has 9been authorized to lease the residential real property or to 10find or obtain a lessee therefor.11    "Tenant's agent" means an agent who agrees to locate 12residential real property for a tenant or who finds a tenant 13for a property and presents an offer to lease to the landlord 14or landlord's agent and negotiates on behalf of the tenant. 15    Section 10. Listing fees.16    (a) Except as otherwise provided:17        (1) a landlord's agent may not impose any fee on, or 18    collect any fee from, a tenant related to the rental of 19    residential real property; and20        (2) any agent who publishes a listing for a rental of 21    residential real property with the permission or 22    authorization of the landlord for such property may not 23    impose any fee on, or collect any fee from, a tenant 24    related to the rental of such property;25    (b) A landlord is in violation of this Section if:  SB1964- 3 -LRB104 09842 JRC 19910 b1        (1) the landlord's agent violates this Section; or2        (2) any agent who publishes a listing for a rental of 3    residential property with the permission or authorization 4    of such landlord violates this Section.5    (c) No person may condition the rental of residential 6property on a tenant engaging any agent, including, but not 7limited to, a dual agent.8    (d) No person may post a listing for the rental of 9residential property that represent that fees must be paid in 10a manner that would violate this Section.11    (e) There is a rebuttable presumption that an agent who 12publishes a listing for a rental of residential property does 13so with the permission of authorization of the landlord of 14such property. 15    Section 15. Rental fees.16    (a) All fees, including, but not limited to, rent, 17security deposits, move-in and move-out fees, utility fees, 18maintenance fees, late fees, electronic payment fees, 19canceled-check fees, convenience fees, and benefit package 20fees, shall be explicitly contained on the first page of a 21lease agreement. The itemized disclosure of the fees shall 22include a short description of each fee.23    (b) If a fee is not explicitly contained on the first page 24of a lease agreement, a tenant is not liable for payment of the 25fee.  SB1964- 4 -LRB104 09842 JRC 19910 b1    (c) A listing for the rental of residential property must 2disclose in a clear and conspicuous manner any fees included 3with the total amount for rent.4    (d) In a lease agreement disclosure or unit listing, the 5landlord must disclose whether utilities are included in rent.6    (e) No lease may contain a clause that assigns a late fee 7for the late payment of rent if payment occurs within 7 days of 8the required date of payment. A lease may provide for a grace 9period longer than 7 days. No late fee may exceed $25.10    (f) No lease may contain a clause that contains any of the 11following:12        (1) assigns to a tenant an administrative fee for the 13    renewal of a lease agreement;14        (2) assigns to a tenant a fee for the modification of a 15    lease;16        (3) assigns to a tenant a fee for contacting the 17    building owner or the property manager;18        (4) assigns to a tenant a fee or penalty for an 19    eviction notice or an eviction action; and20        (5) assigns a fee to a tenant for pet occupancy for the 21    duration of the lease.22    This Section applies to all lease agreements entered into 23after the effective date. 24    Section 20. One-time fees.25    (a) No landlord may charge any one-time fee other than   SB1964- 5 -LRB104 09842 JRC 19910 b1move-in fees, move-out fees, and security deposits.2    (b) If a landlord charges a security deposit at the 3beginning of a tenancy, the landlord may not also charge a 4move-in fee or a move-out fee.5    (c) The total amount of a security deposit may not exceed 6the amount of the first full month's rent for the tenant's 7dwelling unit. If rent is not paid or otherwise apportioned on 8a monthly basis, then for the sole purpose of applying this 9limit the total rent shall be pro-rated on an equal, monthly 10basis and the total charge to a tenant for the cost of a 11security deposit may not exceed the pro-rated, monthly rental 12amount.13    (d) The total amount of a move-in fee or move-out fee may 14not exceed 20% of the first full month's rent for the tenant's 15dwelling unit. If rent is not paid or otherwise apportioned on 16a monthly basis, then for the sole purpose of applying this 17limit the total rent shall be pro-rated on an equal, monthly 18basis and the total charge to a tenant for the cost of a 19move-in fee or move-out fee may not exceed 20% of the 20pro-rated, monthly rental amount.21    (e) Fee payments in installments. Except as provided in 22paragraph (4), tenants may pay one-time fees in installments. 23Landlords may not impose any fee, charge any interest, or 24otherwise impose a cost on a tenant because a tenant elects to 25pay in installments.26        (1) For any rental agreement term that establishes a   SB1964- 6 -LRB104 09842 JRC 19910 b1    tenancy for 6 months or longer, the tenant may elect to pay 2    one-time fees, excluding any payment made by a tenant to 3    the landlord before the inception of tenancy to reimburse 4    the landlord for the cost of obtaining a tenant screening 5    report, in 6 consecutive, equal monthly installments that 6    begin at the inception of the tenancy, or the tenant may 7    propose an alternative installment schedule. If the 8    landlord agrees to the tenant's alternative installment 9    schedule the schedule shall be described in the rental 10    agreement.11        (2) For any rental agreement term that establishes a 12    tenancy between 30 days and 6 months, the tenant may elect 13    to pay one-time fees, excluding any payment made by a 14    tenant to the landlord before the inception of tenancy to 15    reimburse the landlord for the cost of obtaining a tenant 16    screening report, in no more than 4 equal amounts that 17    begin at the inception of the tenancy and are paid in 18    installments of equal duration, or the tenant may propose 19    an alternative installment schedule. If the landlord 20    agrees to the tenant's alternative installment schedule 21    the schedule shall be described in the rental agreement.22        (3) For any rental agreement term that establishes a 23    tenancy from month to month, the tenant may elect to pay 24    one-time fees, excluding any payment made by a tenant to 25    the landlord before the inception of tenancy to reimburse 26    the landlord for the cost of obtaining a tenant screening   SB1964- 7 -LRB104 09842 JRC 19910 b1    report, in 2 equal installments. The first payment is due 2    at the inception of the tenancy and the second payment is 3    due on the first day of the second month or period of the 4    tenancy, or the tenant may propose an alternative 5    installment schedule. If the landlord agrees to the 6    tenant's alternative installment schedule the schedule 7    shall be described in the rental agreement.8        (4) The tenant may not elect to pay one-time fees in 9    installments if the total amount of the one-time fees does 10    not exceed 25% of the first full month's rent for the 11    tenant's dwelling unit and payment of last month's rent is 12    not required at the inception of the tenancy.13    (f) A landlord or a landlord's agent may not rename a fee 14or charge to avoid application of this Section.15    (g) This Section applies to all lease agreements entered 16into after the effective date of this Act. 17    Section 25. Penalties. 18    (a) A violation of this Act constitutes an unlawful 19practice under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 20Practices Act.21    (b) Any person alleging a violation of this Section may 22bring a civil action, in accordance with applicable law, in 23State court. A court may order compensatory, injunctive, and 24declaratory relief as it deems appropriate.   SB1964- 8 -LRB104 09842 JRC 19910 b1    Section 30. Home rule preemption. A home rule unit may not 2regulate in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of this 3Act. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 4Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 5concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 6exercised by the State.